Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1185.
do enact as follows:SB1185,13Section 1. 71.07 (12) of the statutes is created to read:SB1185,1,5471.07 (12) Local newspaper subscription credit. (a) Definitions. In this 5subsection:SB1185,1,661. “Claimant” means a person who files a claim under this subsection.SB1185,2,212. “Qualifying local newspaper” means a newspaper that is qualified to print 2a legal notice under ch. 985.SB1185,2,73(b) Filing claims. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, and 4subject to the limitations provided in this subsection, a claimant may claim as a 5credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02, up to the amount of those taxes, an 6amount equal to 50 percent of the amount paid by the claimant during the taxable 7year for subscriptions to qualifying local newspapers.SB1185,2,118(c) Limitations. 1. The maximum amount of the credit that a claimant may 9claim under this subsection in a taxable year is $250, except that the maximum 10amount that a claimant who is married and files a separate return may claim under 11this subsection in a taxable year is $125.SB1185,2,13122. No credit may be allowed under this subsection unless it is claimed within 13the period specified in s. 71.75 (2).SB1185,2,1514(d) Administration. Subsection (9e) (d), to the extent that it applies to the 15credit under that subsection, applies to the credit under this subsection.SB1185,216Section 2. 71.10 (4) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:SB1185,2,171771.10 (4) (dm) Local newspaper subscription credit under s. 71.07 (12).SB1185,2,1818